Chapter 31: The Cook 30
Yan Langqing had been feeling unsettled lately, and the source of it all was Lin Dan—a person she had long forgotten, yet who had suddenly reappeared. She had once tasted Lin Dan’s four signature dishes, having them packed and delivered to the palace. Their flavors were indeed exquisite.

She had tried to replicate them, using the same ingredients and seasonings, but no matter what she did, she simply couldn't achieve Lin Dan’s taste. Lin Dan must have had unique techniques—ones that others could neither discern nor imitate. Without her personal guidance, even having the recipe would be useless.

Such an extraordinary level of skill was something only veteran chefs with decades, or even a lifetime, of experience could master. But how old was Lin Dan? She was two years younger than Yan Langqing, only twenty-two this year, yet she had already far surpassed everyone else. Yan Langqing had to admit that she felt uneasy, but as the imperial chef, her pride would not allow her to concede defeat to an ordinary cook.

She was determined to attend the competition, but she would have to wait until the palace’s rest day. However, before that day arrived, trouble came knocking. A few guards stormed into the imperial kitchen, their blades gleaming, and demanded, “Who made the Eight Treasures Tofu today? Step forward immediately!”

“It was me,” Yan Langqing responded calmly, stepping up. With the emperor’s favor, she feared nothing in the palace.

“Besides you, who else handled that dish?” the guards questioned further.

Several palace maids and eunuchs stepped forward—Yan Langqing’s trusted aides. Among them was a young man who often went out to seek gourmet delicacies on her behalf.

“Tie them up and send them to the Office of Strict Punishment!” The guards wasted no time, binding them and dragging them away.

Hearing that they were being sent to that hellish prison, Yan Langqing finally panicked. Struggling, she urgently asked, “Sirs, what crime have we committed?”

“You don’t know what you’ve done?” The guards gagged them and dragged them off.

This incident was neither minor nor major, but it involved a serious diplomatic blunder. The emperor had been hosting Mongolian princes in the palace, negotiating the purchase of warhorses. One of the princes had informed the imperial kitchen staff that he was allergic to peanuts, which would make him ill. The staff member had agreed, yet still served a dish of Eight Treasures Tofu containing peanut sauce. As soon as the prince ate it, he broke out in red rashes and suffered unbearable itching. The banquet was ruined, and the horse trade was postponed until he recovered.

To appease the prince, the emperor ordered a thorough investigation, which led straight to Yan Langqing. She genuinely had no knowledge of the prince’s allergy—no one had informed her—but as the head chef and the one who prepared the dish, the emperor had no choice but to have her detained for questioning.

Once it was confirmed that there was no espionage or conspiracy involved—only an unfortunate mistake—the Office of Strict Punishment prepared to release them. However, just then, Prince Gong arrived. Without a word, he threw down two bamboo canes and ordered fifty lashes each for Yan Langqing and her apprentice—the young eunuch.

As the emperor’s favored chef, Yan Langqing was spared from severe punishment; the executioners lifted their hands high and brought them down gently. But her apprentice wasn’t so lucky—by the time the questioning ended, he was covered in blood, barely recognizable. When they dragged him out of the prison, he was on the brink of death.

Yan Langqing herself could barely stand, her legs weak, tears streaming uncontrollably down her face. People often said that the palace was a place that devoured people alive. Because of the emperor’s favor, she had never felt that way before. But today, she finally understood—this dark prison was a gaping maw, waiting to swallow people whole.

While being interrogated on the blood-stained floor, she vaguely heard Prince Gong say, “My royal brother ordered that they be beaten severely… for offending his precious treasure… Ha! Not a concubine, but a mere cook—an extraordinary one at that…”

Yan Langqing was no fool. She quickly realized that her punishment wasn’t just about the mistake with the dish—she had offended someone she shouldn’t have. But who was it? The first suspects that came to mind were the other imperial chefs. After all, only if she was removed would the position of head chef become available.

Now, she viewed everyone as a potential enemy. She could no longer stand staying in the imperial kitchen and just wanted to return home. But before she could leave, an imperial decree arrived—she was stripped of her title as an imperial chef and expelled from the palace. She stood there in shock, filled with resentment and humiliation.

She had truly known nothing about the prince’s allergy. No one had warned her. She had been framed. But without evidence, she couldn’t defend herself. Before she could even change out of her bloodstained clothes, she was thrown onto a carriage and sent away.

As for her young eunuch apprentice, who had often helped her search for gourmet foods outside the palace—his injuries were severe. He was discarded in the Ye Ting Bureau, his survival uncertain. Even if he lived, he would never return to the imperial kitchen. Instead, he would be sent to serve the madwomen in the Cold Palace or clean latrines in the Laundry Bureau. A lifetime of suffering awaited him.

—

Her son had been beaten bloody by the authorities, terrifying Madam Zhou. She anxiously asked what they should do next. Their shop had been smashed, their sign destroyed, and a powerful figure had declared they were forbidden from reopening. Were they really supposed to kneel and beg that little wretch Lin Dan for help? No matter how she thought about it, Madam Zhou found the idea unbearable. But if they didn’t, their family was doomed. They had already lost a hundred thousand taels of silver—a devastating blow that would take at least a decade to recover from.

Gritting his teeth, Yan Shouye said, “Beg? Why would we beg? Lin Dan has her backers, and so do we. Ours is the emperor himself. Once Langqing returns, she’ll plead with the emperor, and everything will be fine. Our Langqing is destined to become an imperial concubine.”

“I thought you said she was going to be a marquis’ wife?” Madam Zhou finally felt a bit relieved.

Madam Hou is nothing; being a consort is far better. All these years, I’ve held Langqing back from getting married, and you blamed me for delaying her future. But look now—if I hadn’t restrained her, would she have such fortune today? Once Langqing returns, our family’s troubles will be over. I’ll have her file a complaint before His Majesty and punish Weiyuan Hou’s people to avenge me!” The more Yan Shouye spoke, the more agitated he became. He propped himself up and shouted, “Someone, go check if the young lady has returned!”

Immediately, a maid ran outside. Shortly after, she rushed back, hoarse from shouting, “Something terrible has happened! The young lady… the young lady came back covered in blood! She’s also been stripped of her position as an imperial chef!”

The palace attendants who escorted Yan Langqing home had been instructed by Prince Gong to publicly announce her demotion and expulsion from the palace. They made no effort to spare the Yan family’s dignity, declaring the news right at the entrance. Passersby, who were mostly neighbors long oppressed by Madam Zhou and Yan Shouye, couldn’t hide their schadenfreude. Serves them right! They thought their daughter becoming an imperial chef made them superior, looking down on everyone else. And now? They finally got what they deserved!

Yan Langqing was so humiliated that she covered her head with a thin blanket before letting the servants carry her out of the carriage. As she entered the house and saw her father lying sick in bed, she was utterly shocked.

Yan Shouye panicked completely. Only now did he reveal the truth about oppressing Lin Dan’s mother and setting fire to the hometown restaurant. Gritting his teeth, he said, “How was I supposed to know that within just two or three months of returning to the capital, she’d befriend so many powerful figures, all willing to stand up for her? If I had known—”

If I had known, I wouldn’t have provoked her!

But Yan Shouye couldn’t bring himself to say the last part. After a moment of contemplation, he muttered, “We can’t rely on His Majesty anymore. Langqing, send a letter to Tang Peng and ask for his help. You probably don’t know, but last time Tang Peng hosted several Mongolian princes at the hometown restaurant and was thoroughly humiliated by Lin Dan. He already detests her. When I mentioned burning down the restaurant and asked for his help in dealing with the southern district officials, he agreed without hesitation. Moreover, he did it for your sake. If you ask him personally, he won’t refuse.

"Our family cannot survive without reopening a shop. What will we eat and drink otherwise? But to reopen, we need a patron. Tang Peng is at least the Vice Minister of War and the son of Yongding Hou. With his influence, even Prince Cheng wouldn’t dare smash our signboard again.”

Yan Shouye rambled on, but Yan Langqing only caught four words—"Mongolian princes.” A chill ran down her spine, and she immediately asked, “The Mongolian princes dined at Lin Dan’s place? She has connections with them?”

“How could she have connections with them? It was Young Master Tang who brought them there. A few years ago, he fought alongside the Mongols against the Xiongnu. They have strong ties,” Yan Shouye explained, eager to buy himself an official position and well-informed on court affairs.

“The young master… It was the young master…” Yan Langqing froze, tears welling up in her eyes. She had thought she was framed by the imperial kitchen, but it turned out Tang Shizi had a hand in it as well. Of course—who else could have invited Mongolian royalty or reached deep into the palace?

And then there were Prince Cheng and Prince Gong—both supporting Lin Dan. She had worked tirelessly in the palace, making so many contributions for her family, yet everything crumbled overnight. Why?

Overcome with sorrow, Yan Langqing roared, “Father, didn’t I tell you to live quietly and stay out of trouble? Did my words mean nothing to you? Years ago, because of your mess, I was expelled from Hou’s manor and have been resented by the young master ever since. Now, you stirred up trouble again, and I’ve been cast out of the palace in disgrace. Are you satisfied now? How many more times will you drag me down?”

Watching his daughter collapse onto a chair in tears, Yan Shouye was both ashamed and regretful but utterly helpless. He stammered, “I didn’t expect Lin Dan to be such a thorny hedgehog—impossible to touch. How about… how about you still send that letter to Tang Peng? He’ll surely help you.”



===================================================================

Chapter 32: The Cook 31

Lin Dan stayed in the outskirts of the capital for only two nights before returning. She had already sold her shop to Qin Erniang and needed to move her belongings out to make space for the new owner.

“Can’t you keep this shop? Why not continue running the Home-style Restaurant?” Qin Erniang felt like the biggest fool in the world—she had bought Lin Dan’s shop, yet she still wished to return it. The thought of never again tasting Lin Dan’s cooking made life seem unbearable.

“I won’t run it anymore. My business in the capital is almost settled, and it’s time for me to move on.” Lin Dan had long grown accustomed to a wandering life and never stayed in one place for too long.

As they spoke, persistent knocking sounded from outside, accompanied by voices calling, “Has Shopkeeper Lin returned? When will the restaurant reopen? Shopkeeper Lin, Shopkeeper Lin…” After shouting for a long while without receiving a response, the people outside finally sighed in disappointment and left.

This had happened several times in the past few days while Lin Dan was away. Almost every so often, customers would come knocking, asking if the restaurant was open. Now that the Home-style Restaurant had closed, the people of the southern district could only dream of having authentic hometown dishes again.

In these times, those who could leave their hometowns to earn a living in the capital were mostly strong young men. They hardly knew how to cook, and even if they did, their food could never compare to Lin Dan’s. Thus, they were left with no choice but to gnaw on coarse cornbread.

Who would want to suffer if they could live comfortably? Who would choose coarse cornbread when they could have delicious and affordable food? Life was hard without Shopkeeper Lin!

Lin Dan paid no attention to the commotion outside and focused on packing her belongings. Qin Erniang, on the other hand, scoffed, “We’re not opening the door! Let them stew in their own frustration! They enjoyed the restaurant’s food so much, but when trouble came knocking, not a single one of them stood up to help. A bunch of ungrateful beasts!”

Lin Dan smiled without responding. They weren’t exactly beasts—this was simply how the world worked. But she was still grateful to Qin Erniang. If it weren’t for her leading the girls from the brothel to drive away Madam Zhou that day, the woman might have caused trouble for much longer. People helping you was kindness; not helping you was simply their choice—no one could be blamed.

That was why Lin Dan had sold the shop to Qin Erniang at the low price of ten taels of silver, even throwing in a recipe for wine and a few dishes to go with it. A brothel wasn’t a place for meals, but drinks and snacks were always needed. This was enough to repay the favor.

As the two continued tidying up, sudden shrieks of agony rang out from outside, followed by sounds of begging and kneeling. The noise was chaotic and unsettling.

“Who’s fighting outside? I’ll go take a look. You stay inside and hide,” Qin Erniang said, tossing aside her broom and heading toward the door.

Lin Dan wouldn’t let her take the risk. She pulled Qin Erniang behind her, grabbed a kitchen knife, and stepped outside. Peeking through a crack in the door, she saw Tang Jiu standing upright on the steps, while several guards pinned down a group of ruffians, using the backs of their knives to break their hands one by one.

The wailing and pleas for mercy came from these ruffians. Kneeling beside them, bound tightly with ropes, was a young man—Tang Peng. His back was strapped with thorny branches, and he shouted angrily, “Ninth Brother, you’re humiliating me like this for an outsider? When I return, I’ll write to Uncle about this!”

“You abused your power and bullied the people, yet you think you have the right to complain?” Tang Jiu’s tone was indifferent.

“And isn’t what you’re doing now also an abuse of power?” Tang Peng struggled, only to be forcibly pressed to the ground by Zhao Liu.

Tang Jiu ignored him. Hearing movement behind him, he turned around, and his eyes lit up. “Lin Dan, you’re back.”

“What’s going on here?” Lin Dan instinctively raised her hand to point at Tang Peng and the ruffians, only to realize she was still holding the kitchen knife. She quickly lowered it.

Tang Jiu cupped his hands apologetically and said, “The authorities ignored the arson case because of Tang Peng’s influence. So today, I’ve brought him here to accept punishment. These ruffians are the ones who set the fire.” Clearly, he had already heard about Lin Dan’s return and had come specifically to settle the matter.

Understanding dawned on Lin Dan. She glanced at Tang Peng, who was still shouting and cursing, then said with gratitude, “Thank you for standing up for me, Your Highness. I accept your apology.” With that, she turned to close the door.

Tang Jiu quickly blocked the door with his hand, his voice tinged with plea. “Then… will you stay this time?”

Ten years ago, he couldn’t make Lin Dan stay. Ten years later, he hoped to change that ending. No one knew how many times he had dreamed of her stubborn back as she walked away, disappearing into the mist, leaving him to wake up with regret and guilt.

If only he hadn’t blindly believed others, forcing Lin Dan to compete against Yan Langqing, her father wouldn’t have died dishonored. He had practically grown up eating the meals cooked by Lin Dan’s father and should have known better. Yet back then, it was as if he had been bewitched—he believed everything Yan Langqing said, ultimately leading to the downfall of the Lin family, forcing Lin Dan and her mother to wander homeless for years.

He had lived his life without regrets—except for how he had wronged the late Lin family, Lin Dan, and her mother. Seeing Lin Dan return to the capital and reestablish her family’s legacy filled him with joy. He knew just how talented she was. Given enough time, she could surpass even her father’s achievements.

Yet, some people refused to let her succeed, throwing obstacle after obstacle in her way, forcing her to leave once more. By now, Tang Jiu’s hatred for the Yan family had seeped into his bones—otherwise, he wouldn’t have pulled strings to strip Yan Langqing of her title as imperial chef.

This time, he repeated with greater urgency, “Will you stay? I promise no one will dare oppress you again.”

Lin Danqian gave a faint smile but still firmly shook her head.

Tang Jiu’s anticipation instantly faded. Just as he was about to say something else, a man squeezed through the crowd with a cautious demeanor and said, “I am a servant of the Yan family. I have come to deliver a letter for my young lady.”

“Give it to me,” Lin Dan extended her hand to receive the letter and let out a slow breath. The person she had been waiting for had finally arrived…

Tang Jiu glanced at the letter and saw a line of words written in delicate calligraphy: June 6th, Xiang Garden Gathering.

Xiang Garden was an imperial estate. Ordinary people couldn’t even approach it, let alone enter. It was one of the emperor’s favorite gardens, constantly guarded by imperial sentries. Given Yan Langqing’s status, how could she possibly have access to it? Could it be that she had the emperor’s approval?

Thinking of this, Tang Jiu suddenly recalled the message his sister had sent him, mentioning that in recent years, the emperor had shown great favor toward Yan Langqing and seemed to have intentions of bringing her into the harem. This was also the reason why rumors had spread about the noble consort planning to arrange a marriage for Yan Langqing, intending to have her wed into the marquis’s household.

If the emperor was indeed backing Yan Langqing, this competition might not be fair at all. He lowered his voice and said, “Xiang Garden is an imperial estate; without an edict, no one can use it. The last person who hosted a gathering there was the Grand Princess.”

Lin Dan slightly furrowed her brows, then nodded and said, “I understand. Thank you for the reminder, Your Highness.” Her tone was calm and composed, as if entirely unbothered.

Tang Jiu couldn’t tell what she was thinking and continued, “I can find a way to cancel this competition.” If the competition wasn’t going to be fair, there was no need to participate. First, they could let Yan Langqing fall out of favor with the emperor, and then they could compete at a later time. Fairness was rare in this world, but he wanted to give Lin Dan justice—justice that had been long overdue for ten years.

“There’s no need. I have my own way of dealing with it.” Lin Dan shook her head with a smile. She had waited for ten years and no longer had the patience to wait any longer.

“Think it over again. With the emperor’s favor, the judges won’t dare let Yan Langqing lose,” Tang Jiu tried one last time to dissuade her.

Lin Dan waved her hand, her answer unchanged: “I have my own way. Your Highness need not worry.”

Tang Jiu gritted his teeth as he looked at her, feeling both helpless and moved. Lin Dan was still as stubborn as ever, but it was precisely this stubbornness that had shaped her into the person she was today.

“Fine, I’ll find a way for you!” With that, he dragged Tang Peng away in large strides.

Qin Erniang tiptoed to peek at the letter and sighed. “Xiang Garden, huh? That’s the emperor’s favorite place. Ordinary people aren’t allowed in. Manager Lin, don’t be so stubborn with His Highness Tang. Sometimes, compromising a little doesn’t mean you’ve lost. We all know your skills—there’s no need to crash an egg against a rock.”

Lin Dan shook her head, her gaze unwavering.

—

June 6th arrived quickly. Lin Dan accepted the invitation and, after passing through multiple checkpoints and thorough inspections, was finally allowed to enter Xiang Garden. Inside, guards were stationed every five steps, with pavilions appearing every ten steps. Everywhere, patrolling sentries and stern-faced palace attendants moved about, exuding an air of imperial majesty.

For an ordinary person, just entering this place would be enough to make them tremble with fear, let alone compete in a contest. Clearly, before they had even met, Yan Langqing had already tried to intimidate Lin Dan.

Lin Dan didn’t know who she truly was, but she could guess that her situation must be quite extraordinary, perhaps even turbulent. Otherwise, she wouldn’t feel the slightest bit of fear in such an imposing setting—her heart remained as still as a pool of dead water, without even a ripple.

She walked into the inner courtyard with a calm demeanor, entered the main hall, and immediately knelt to bow upon seeing a handsome man seated in the host’s position. The man wore bright yellow-soled boots—it was undoubtedly the emperor.

“Rise,” the emperor said, smiling magnanimously. “I heard you are competing with Langqing in a culinary contest, so I left the palace to personally witness it.”

He continued with a gracious tone, “In this competition, you both may showcase your skills without concern. Just state whatever ingredients you need, and the palace attendants will prepare them for you.”

Yan Langqing lowered her head, covering her mouth as if shy. The emperor glanced at her and smiled even more warmly. His words seemed impartial, yet within them, he subtly revealed his close relationship with Yan Langqing. Who would dare defy his intentions now?

The judges exchanged glances, each deep in thought. They included retired imperial chefs, renowned gourmet connoisseurs, and the head chefs of famous restaurants—all experts in the culinary arts.

Lin Dan swept her gaze over them and immediately understood—most of them had likely been involved in that past competition, as if history was repeating itself. She also noticed several familiar faces among the spectators: Prince Tang, Prince Cheng, Prince Gong, Marquis Weiyuan, and the Prince of Dianqian. Even Yan Shouye, who had been beaten and should have been bedridden, had come. He was staring at her with a mixture of resentment and smugness.

Lin Dan curtsied and directly asked, “Your Majesty, can you guarantee the fairness of this competition?”

The emperor prided himself on being a wise ruler. In the early years of his reign, he had promoted open discourse and recruited talented individuals. He was also known for tolerating outspoken officials who dared to criticize him. Now that Lin Dan had laid things bare, he had no choice but to nod, whether he wished to or not.


——————————————————————————————————————————————————————————————————————————————————————————————————————————————
Chapter 33: The Cook (32)
Lin Dan's bold words took the emperor by surprise. Initially, he had looked down upon this plain-looking woman, but now, a hint of interest flickered in his eyes. “Naturally, I can ensure the fairness of this competition. I will only observe and not comment. The decision on who is the better cook will be left to these seasoned gourmets and veteran chefs.”

Facing the judges, Lin Dan bowed deeply to each of them before speaking again. “Though Your Majesty says so, this competition is still unfair to me. Chef Yan is highly favored by you, and now you have even granted her the use of Xiang Garden for the contest while personally coming to watch. Your actions have already indicated your preference for her. As the ruler of the world, your subjects would never dare to go against your wishes. The moment I stepped into Xiang Garden today, I had already lost. I understand this, and as the wise and mighty ruler, I believe Your Majesty does too.”

The more people listened, the more astonished they became. No one had expected Lin Dan to be so outspoken.

However, the emperor simply burst into hearty laughter, his interest deepening. “In that case, what do you propose? Do you still wish to proceed with the competition?”

Yan Langqing wore a complicated expression. If possible, she would prefer to compete with Lin Dan in a fair and square manner. However, given the emperor’s obvious favoritism towards her, she could not afford to reject his kindness. On the other hand, Yan Shouye saw no need to continue the competition. To him, Lin Dan had come today only to disgrace herself. Once his daughter became a consort, he would make sure to eliminate Lin Dan completely.

Unexpectedly, Lin Dan nodded without hesitation. “Of course, we must compete. But to ensure fairness, I will set the rules. May I ask for Your Majesty’s approval? When I first competed with Chef Yan, I was the head chef of a marquis’ household, and my father was greatly esteemed by the Yongding Marquis. To keep things fair, Chef Yan set the competition rules at that time—she decided what dishes we would prepare, how we would compete, and who the judges would be. Now that our situations have reversed, I am making the same request. Surely, this is not unreasonable?”

The emperor glanced at Yan Langqing before nodding. “Indeed, it is not unreasonable. Speak, then. How do you wish to compete?”

Although Lin Dan seemed to have taken control of the situation, the emperor’s authority still loomed over her. No matter how exquisite her dishes were, a single word from the judges could send her into the abyss. True fairness never existed in the face of power. While Lin Dan was bold, she was not particularly shrewd. Thinking of this, the emperor shook his head in disappointment, his interest waning.

Lin Dan spoke unhurriedly. “For this competition, we will use the same ingredients to make the same dish. Just one dish.”

Yan Langqing asked, “What dish do you propose?”

“With the Dragon Boat Festival approaching, let’s make zongzi (sticky rice dumplings),” Lin Dan suggested, tilting her head slightly with a faint smile.

Yan Langqing was momentarily stunned before she slowly nodded. Having tasted Lin Dan’s skills through her four signature dishes, she had assumed that Lin Dan would propose an extremely difficult dish. However, she had not expected her to suggest making zongzi. Even so, Yan Langqing was unperturbed. The imperial concubines also loved zongzi, and she had prepared various types for them before, earning their praise. If she could satisfy those picky eaters, she was confident she could impress the judges as well.

“You and I will each make fifty catties of zongzi, and we will only make meat-filled ones. Is that acceptable?” Lin Dan continued.

“Fifty catties?” Yan Langqing finally showed some surprise.

“Is that acceptable?” Lin Dan fixed her gaze on her.

“Yes.”

“Very well. Then I request that His Majesty provide us with one hundred catties of glutinous rice and fifty catties of pork belly. The rice and meat should be placed together in a single container. Once we enter the kitchen, we will divide them ourselves. If we need any additional seasonings, we can ask the palace attendants separately, without interfering with each other. Is that acceptable?” Lin Dan clasped her hands in a respectful yet firm manner.

The emperor nodded. “Granted. Go and prepare.”

Each of them making fifty catties of zongzi—who was supposed to eat all that? Was Lin Dan trying to stuff everyone to death?

The emperor was not the only one puzzled; the other guests also looked confused. However, Lin Dan and Yan Langqing had already headed to the kitchen, leaving no time for further inquiries. Even if they had asked, Lin Dan likely wouldn’t have given them an answer. They would have to wait and see the outcome. What was expected to be a one-sided competition had now turned into a suspenseful event. This Manager Lin was indeed an interesting character.

Regardless of how the nobles speculated, Lin Dan remained calm as she entered the kitchen. A massive wooden barrel filled with one hundred catties of glutinous rice was carried in by panting palace attendants, followed by another barrel containing fifty catties of pork belly.

Lin Dan pinched a handful of glutinous rice and nodded in satisfaction.

Yan Langqing spoke gently. “Your concerns are unnecessary. I would never stoop so low as to have them prepare better ingredients for me and worse ones for you. You may select your portion first, and I will take what remains.”

Lin Dan turned to look at her, a faint smile on her lips. “Then I thank you, Chef Yan.”

Yan Langqing slowly rolled up her sleeves. “Shall we begin, then?”

“Of course. But before we start, I need to set a standard for the shape and size of the zongzi. You have no objections, do you?” Lin Dan took out three bamboo leaves, folded them into a cone, placed some glutinous rice inside, and tied it with string. Holding it up as an example, she said, “The same shape, the same size. Can you make them like this?”

The request was rather odd, but Yan Langqing did not dwell on it. She simply nodded. “I can.” She quickly wrapped an identical triangular zongzi and handed it to Lin Dan for inspection.

Lin Dan unwrapped the two rice dumplings, put the glutinous rice back, and smiled faintly. “Then we can begin.”

The two of them each occupied a stove and got busy. Yan Langqing first soaked the glutinous rice, then sliced the pork belly into thin pieces, marinated it with soy sauce, fine salt, sugar, peanut oil, and other seasonings. When she looked up, she found that Lin Dan was tending the stove, but the glutinous rice and pork belly remained untouched.

The rice dumplings weren’t even wrapped yet, so why was she lighting the stove at this stage? Feeling puzzled, she observed more closely and discovered that Lin Dan wasn’t using firewood but sesame stalks, which she had specially requested from the palace attendants. These stalks still carried many ripe sesame seeds, which crackled as the flames licked them, releasing a rich and distinctive roasted aroma.

Yan Langqing unconsciously took a deep breath, growing even more curious.

Lin Dan, however, didn’t spare her a glance. She simply gathered the burned sesame stalks into a pile, wrapped them in a fine silk cloth, and kneaded them in cooled boiled water until the clear water turned into a murky gray liquid. She then filtered it several times with the silk cloth to remove all residues before soaking the glutinous rice in the prepared solution.

As the snow-white glutinous rice was submerged, it took on a dingy hue. At that moment, four large characters popped into Yan Langqing’s mind—wanton waste of good food! These rice dumplings were meant for the judges to taste, yet Lin Dan handled the ingredients in such a way—wasn’t she concerned about hygiene? Though filled with doubts, Yan Langqing had no intention of questioning or interfering. This competition was tied to her reputation, and she certainly wouldn’t stop Lin Dan from sabotaging herself.

Once Lin Dan had finished soaking the glutinous rice, she moved on to the pork belly. Her choice of seasonings was similar to Yan Langqing’s, with only slight differences in proportions. When all preparations were complete, she began wrapping the rice dumplings. It was evident that she was highly skilled—she flipped her wrist, rolling the bamboo leaves into shape, layered glutinous rice at the bottom, placed a piece of pork in the center, covered it with more glutinous rice, gently pressed it down to compact it, then folded the bamboo leaves over and tied the dumpling securely with a string, finishing with a small knot at the end.

Yan Langqing also started wrapping her dumplings, making them identical in size and shape to Lin Dan’s. After finishing each one, she tossed it into a nearby basin, ready for cooking.

From morning until afternoon, the two of them wrapped a total of fifty catties of rice dumplings each, placing them in two identical barrels. By now, the dumplings had been fully cooked and were steaming hot. Before the judges could taste them, Lin Dan counted her dumplings carefully, then walked over to Yan Langqing’s barrel and said slowly, “Let’s switch places.”

Though confused, Yan Langqing didn’t see any harm in it, so she moved to stand by Lin Dan’s barrel. Even after switching positions, she could recognize her own barrel—did Lin Dan think she could steal her dumplings this way?

Only then did Lin Dan invite the guests over and respectfully asked, “May I request five esteemed gentlemen, each accompanied by two attendants, to enter the kitchen and swap the positions of the two barrels? You may swap as many times as you like or not at all. Once one gentleman is done, the next may continue, and after five rounds, no one is allowed to disclose how many times they swapped.”

“What exactly are you trying to do?” The emperor frowned, unable to see through Lin Dan’s plan. Normally, since the rice dumplings were ready, they should simply be unwrapped and tasted to determine the winner. But now, Lin Dan seemed to be playing a game—was she toying with everyone? Where did she get such audacity?

“Your Majesty has already agreed that I will determine the competition rules. Does that still hold?” Lin Dan countered instead of answering.

The emperor furrowed his brows but waved his hand. “Five people, step forward and switch the positions of the barrels.”

Tang Jiu, the Duke of Dianqian, the Prince of Cheng, the Prince of Gong, and Marquis Weiyuan immediately stepped forward.

Yan Langqing hesitated briefly but ultimately remained silent. Though these men were Lin Dan’s staunch supporters, they were not the judges and had no say in the evaluation of the dumplings. They posed no real threat to the competition. Was Lin Dan simply trying to confuse the judges so they couldn’t distinguish whose dumplings were whose? It was a clever tactic, but she had forgotten that several of the imperial chefs present had once worked in the royal kitchens. They were very familiar with Yan Langqing’s cooking—some had even been personally invited by the emperor to mentor her.

They would not fail to recognize her craftsmanship. Moreover, Lin Dan had used such a questionable method to treat the glutinous rice—could the dumplings even be edible? Yan Langqing had serious doubts and was already convinced of her victory. If Lin Dan had been inferior to her ten years ago, nothing had changed now.

The emperor also saw through Lin Dan’s strategy and shook his head. The shopkeeper Lin was fond of playing clever tricks, but they never seemed to hit the mark.

After the five men swapped the barrels, they returned with grim expressions. To them, Lin Dan’s efforts were nothing more than a desperate struggle. The moment she accepted the challenge, she had already lost—under powerful influence, fairness was an illusion, and she should have known that.

Lin Dan, however, remained completely composed. She cupped her hands and declared, “The competition has concluded. Now, I shall set the judging criteria. Since everyone present holds personal biases, it would be unfair to rely on any of you as judges. I propose taking these two barrels of dumplings to the city gate, where they will be unwrapped and cut into pieces for the citizens to taste. Each person may then choose one dumpling to take home. Whichever batch is taken first wins. Does this seem fair? Don’t worry—I have marked the dumplings and can distinguish which batch belongs to whom. I also counted them in advance—each barrel contains exactly four hundred dumplings, with extras set aside to prevent any disputes over the results.”


======================================================================

Chapter 34: The Cook 33
As soon as Lin Dan finished speaking, everyone present was stunned, even the emperor, who was always composed and strategic, showed a look of surprise.

According to Lin Dan’s suggestion, the rice dumplings should be given to the people for tasting, allowing them to choose their favorite. Since the tasters wouldn’t know who made the two batches of dumplings, nor that this was part of a competition, the result would be the fairest possible.

No one could refute Lin Dan’s words, not even the emperor. He had already promised her a fair and just competition, and he had to keep his word. The emperor’s decree was as weighty as a mountain—there was no room for going back on it.

Only then did the emperor realize Lin Dan’s true intention. The decision of this competition was no longer in his hands, nor in the hands of the judges, but in the hands of the common people. To prevent him from using his imperial power to interfere, she even stipulated that only those entering the city could receive the dumplings, not those leaving. While the emperor could send people out of the city to collect dumplings, he had no control over who entered the city. Who would come to the capital today and at what time—only the heavens knew.

Moreover, the two batches of dumplings had already been mixed together. Even if the emperor possessed great power and immediately sent word for people to disguise themselves as commoners to enter the city, they wouldn’t be able to distinguish which batch belonged to Yan Langqing. In the end, the choice would still be based on personal preference. Furthermore, he couldn't bring himself to inquire about which batch was whose.

"Is this fair?" The emperor shook his head, then suddenly laughed out loud. "Fair? It couldn’t be any fairer! Guards, take these two barrels of dumplings to the west city gate. Distribute them to those entering the city. Each person may taste both but can only choose one to take." This way, they would have to pick the one they truly liked best.

The emperor originally intended to support Yan Langqing. After all, she was a woman he had taken a liking to and had just suffered an injustice. Spoiling her a little wouldn’t hurt. But now, he found Lin Dan incredibly interesting, and this competition even more so. Why not be fair and make it even more exciting? From now on, he would do nothing and allow no one to break the rules. The people would determine the outcome.

Seeing the emperor's amused expression, Tang Jiu finally let out a sigh of relief. He then looked at Lin Dan, who remained at ease, his gaze burning with admiration before he smiled slightly. Once again, he had worried for nothing. Lin Dan could always face any crisis calmly and find a way out with her persistence and wisdom.

Even Marquis Wei Yuan’s usual lazy demeanor faded. He turned his head and stared intently at Lin Dan. Prince Cheng and Prince Gong whispered to each other and chuckled, looking quite entertained. The Prince of Dianqian silently rubbed the teacup in his hand, occasionally glancing at Lin Dan with deep eyes.

The one with the stiffest expression was none other than Yan Langqing. She never expected Lin Dan to propose such a method of judgment. However, upon careful thought, she had to admire Lin Dan’s intelligence. The emperor was particularly fond of quick-witted women and enjoyed interesting events. Now, he likely appreciated Lin Dan a great deal and would no longer show favoritism.

Yan Langqing felt a bit uneasy but not panicked, for she believed in her own skills.

The group arrived at the west city gate and chose a high platform on the gate to observe. The two barrels of dumplings were placed side by side, and a dumpling from each was peeled open and broken apart for the city entrants to taste. Since the Dragon Boat Festival was approaching, many wealthy individuals would distribute dumplings to the poor as an act of charity. Thus, passersby did not find it strange. With guards overseeing the process, there was no chaos. Only those entering the city were allowed to take one, and no one dared to take more than one.

After tasting both samples, the entrants quickly selected their preferred dumpling and left. Standing atop the platform, the emperor no longer felt bored—he was now brimming with excitement and anticipation. He loved this competition format because of its unpredictability, which made it even more interesting.

Processing glutinous rice and pork belly took time. By the time the dumplings were ready, it was already afternoon, with only a short time left before the city gates closed. Some time was lost on the way, so neither barrel was completely emptied. However, the outcome was still evident—whichever batch had fewer leftovers was the winner.

The group moved to a nearby restaurant and booked the most luxurious private room. As soon as the emperor entered, he eagerly ordered, "Servants, count the remaining dumplings in each barrel!"

Immediately, two guards stepped forward and carefully counted the dumplings in each barrel. They recorded the numbers on paper and had another two guards recount them. After three counts, all results were the same. A guard stepped forward and reported, "Your Majesty, the barrel on the left contains 288 dumplings, while the one on the right contains 63. The right side wins."

The difference was quite significant! The emperor looked at Lin Dan and raised an eyebrow. "Can you recognize which barrel is yours?"

Lin Dan walked to the right barrel and firmly stated, "Of course."

Yan Langqing, on the other hand, hesitated as she looked between the two barrels, her face turning pale.

"How do you know this one is yours?" The emperor asked, amused.

"When tying the dumplings, I made a small knot at the end of each string. You may check for yourselves." Lin Dan took out a dumpling and displayed its string. Sure enough, there was a tiny knot at the end, which was difficult to notice unless closely examined.

To ensure fairness, several guards took out all the remaining dumplings and examined them one by one. They nodded and reported, "Your Majesty, the dumplings in the right barrel all have knots, while those in the left do not."

Lin Dan then added, "Even without the knots, we can simply unwrap the dumplings. Chef Yan, surely you can recognize your own craftsmanship?" With that, she picked up two dumplings and calmly unwrapped them.

Before unwrapping, both dumplings appeared identical in size and shape, as if made by the same person. However, once the leaves were peeled away, the differences became stark.

From the high platform, the observers hadn’t been able to see the details clearly, but now, the dumplings lay in white jade plates for all to examine.

The dumpling on the right was golden and translucent, with a delicate sheen, looking exquisite and appealing. The one on the left, however, was uneven in color—its ends were slightly yellowish-white, while the center was dark brown, as if soaked in a dye vat, appearing rather unappealing.

A good dish is judged by color, aroma, and taste. Seeing the contrast, everyone had to admit that based on appearance alone, Lin Dan had already taken the lead.

All of Yan Langqing’s dumplings shared this mottled coloring because the glutinous rice was white, and the marinated pork belly was dark brown. When steamed together, they naturally stained each other, resulting in an unattractive mix. But she never expected that Lin Dan’s rice, soaked in alkaline water, would turn such a brilliant golden hue—looking fresh, tender, and inviting. How was this possible?

In shock, she protested, "This isn't right! Lin Dan's glutinous rice was soaked in alkaline water, which is dirty! How could it possibly look better than mine?"

Before the others could react with surprise, Lin Dan calmly explained, "You only know part of the truth. Do you realize that ashes from burnt wood are even cleaner than spring water? The fire purifies all impurities. Alkaline water also contains a special medium that can be used for cleaning hands and softening dried foods. When dried ingredients are soaked in alkaline water, they soften much faster than in regular water. My dumplings are made this way—they're called 'alkaline water dumplings,' a specialty of the Baiyue region. Not only is the rice not dirty, but it also turns a beautiful golden hue, with a rich and unique aroma and a soft yet chewy texture. It’s much tastier than regular rice dumplings."

She gestured toward the plates. "We've judged the appearance—now, let’s compare the aroma and taste."

The emperor picked up the plate, carefully sniffed the two rice dumplings, and couldn't help but raise his eyebrows. He then handed the plate to the elderly imperial chef beside him. After taking a whiff, the chef’s eyes lit up, and he passed it to the next judge. The dumplings were passed around in a circle, and finally, they reached Yan Langqing.

Yan Langqing had been skeptical at first, but after smelling them, her face turned ashen. Just as Lin Dan had said, the gray water zongzi exuded a faint herbal aroma, accompanied by a refreshing hint of astringency and a subtle umami scent, making it incredibly unique. In contrast, her white zongzi only carried the fragrance of glutinous rice and meat. While pleasant, it lacked depth and complexity, appearing rather ordinary compared to Lin Dan’s creation.

“Let’s taste them,” Lin Dan said calmly as she picked up her chopsticks and cut open both zongzi.

Everyone sampled the two types of zongzi, and their expressions were filled with even greater astonishment. The reason was simple—this gray water zongzi was not only visually appealing and uniquely fragrant, but its texture was also exceptionally soft, sticky, and smooth. Despite being cooled, its flavor remained intact. The first bite offered a slight chewiness; at first, one could taste the mild sweetness of glutinous rice, followed by a touch of astringency, and finally, an overwhelming burst of umami and rich meatiness. The abundant juices filled their mouths, leaving an unforgettable aftertaste.

However, after tasting Lin Dan’s zongzi and then moving on to Yan Langqing’s, the difference in texture and flavor became stark. The white glutinous rice zongzi had cooled and lost its original softness. It was slightly sticky when chewed, making it difficult to eat, and the core remained hard and tough to swallow. Even the meat filling had turned clumpy and dry.

Noticing the slight frowns on everyone’s faces, Lin Dan said unhurriedly, “Gray water zongzi actually tastes even better when fully cooled. It remains soft and chewy, making it easy to eat. Even without any filling, just dipping it in sugar would make for an exceptional treat. In contrast, ordinary white glutinous rice zongzi turns dry and hard when cold, becoming unpalatable unless reheated. That is the fundamental difference between the two. But to ensure you don’t think I won unfairly, let’s reheat both types and taste them again.”

Yan Langqing’s hand trembled slightly as she gripped her chopsticks, but she said nothing. Instead, she looked at the emperor with a glimmer of hope.

The emperor chuckled and waved his hand. “Someone, go heat the zongzi!”

Immediately, two palace servants took the zongzi to the kitchen. Before long, they returned with a food box. The reheated white zongzi was indeed much softer and more palatable than before, but Lin Dan’s gray water zongzi now glowed with a golden hue. Rich and delicate oils seeped from the gaps between the glutinous rice grains, coating them in a layer of glossy moisture, making it look far more appetizing than Yan Langqing’s white zongzi.

The emperor’s gaze was instantly drawn to the gray water zongzi. He picked up his chopsticks, took a bite, and let out a satisfied sigh. The glutinous rice, soaked in gray water, had become even sweeter, softer, and smoother, thoroughly infused with the juices from the meat filling. Every bite was bursting with rich umami flavor, making one wish they could swallow their own tongue in delight. After tasting Lin Dan’s secret gray water zongzi, the emperor moved on to Yan Langqing’s white zongzi—only to be met with a single thought: utterly unremarkable.

When unwrapped, the gray water zongzi was both visually appealing and delicious, while the white zongzi was rough and hardened, making it difficult to eat. No wonder Lin Dan’s bucket was nearly emptied while Yan Langqing’s was still half full. This time, her loss was undeniable.

＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝

Chapter 35: The Cook (34)
The Emperor held special feelings for Yan Langqing, naturally finding her more pleasing to the eye than others. However, even so, he could not, in good conscience, claim that Yan Langqing's rice dumplings were better than Lin Dan’s. The competition results had already been determined, and nothing he said now could change them. It was best to stay true to his own palate.

With this in mind, he set down his chopsticks and slowly announced, "Lin Dan, you win."

As soon as the words left his mouth, a sharp sound echoed through the private room—it was Yan Langqing's chopsticks dropping to the table. Everyone turned to look at her and saw her eyes brimming with tears, her face pale, and her hands and feet trembling slightly as if she were on the verge of collapse. Her father, Yan Shouye, was staring straight at Lin Dan, his face full of resentment and unwillingness.

Lin Dan bowed respectfully, showing no sign of arrogance. "Then, please have Imperial Chef Yan fulfill the wager and return the golden knife and recipe book."

Yan Langqing opened her mouth with difficulty, seemingly wanting to speak, but Yan Shouye furiously interjected, "No! That was my father’s possession—it belongs to the Yan family! Why should we give it to you?"

"The Grandmaster passed it to my father on his deathbed, making it his rightful property. Back then, you tried to take it from me by proving your own culinary skills. Now that I am reclaiming it through my own abilities, what is wrong with that?" Lin Dan countered.

Yan Shouye wanted to argue further, but the Emperor's brows had already furrowed in displeasure. Yan Langqing immediately pressed down on her father’s shoulder and said hoarsely, "I brought the items with me; I’ll give them to you." She had intended to display her generosity but had never expected to truly lose to Lin Dan. However, the commoners had declared her defeat, and even the Emperor had personally confirmed it. No matter how unwilling she was, what could she do?

Lin Dan set the golden knife aside and flipped through the Yan family recipe book, her eyebrows raising slightly. The book had originally been split into two parts—Lin Baotian’s half had been returned to Lin Dan, while Yan Langqing should have had only sixty pages remaining. Yet now, the book was even thicker than before. It was evident that over the years, Yan Langqing had put in significant effort, developing many new dishes and adding brilliance to the Yan family’s culinary legacy.

However, the more Lin Dan read, the deeper her frown became. By the end, she let out a cold laugh. She tore out a page and handed it to one of the master chefs who had come to watch the competition, saying, "This Braised Deer Tendon was created by Master Liu—it's time to return it to its rightful owner. And this Stewed Soft-Shell Turtle belongs to Chef Fang—this is yours." She continued tearing out page after page, returning each recipe to its original creator.

The chefs glanced at Yan Langqing, then at the Emperor, unsure whether to accept or refuse.

The Emperor looked puzzled, uncertain about Lin Dan’s intentions, but Prince Cheng sneered and said, "Your Majesty, you may not be aware, but this Imperial Chef of yours is quite domineering. Unable to create outstanding dishes to please you, she instead seizes recipes from others, forbidding them from selling their own creations. She claims that if Your Majesty has eaten a dish, then no one else may eat it, as it would be an offense against the Emperor. If that’s the case, perhaps Your Majesty should issue a list of permitted foods so that we can avoid committing a crime!"

Prince Gong feigned shock, spreading his hands. "If that were true, wouldn't we all starve? If His Majesty eats meat, does that mean we can't? If His Majesty drinks water, must we also abstain?"

Prince Cheng quickly reassured him, "Don't worry, you won’t starve. You can always dine at the Yan family’s restaurant. While no one else is allowed to serve the dishes the Emperor has eaten, their restaurant continues to do so without restriction. While others fear imperial authority, the Yan family does not—they have Imperial Chef Yan backing them!"

Their back-and-forth revealed all of the Yan family’s underhanded tactics in suppressing their competitors while also implicating them in overstepping imperial authority. Yan Shouye trembled violently, his face devoid of color. Yan Langqing, in utter disbelief, turned to her father and cried out, "Father, what is going on?" Then, she immediately knelt and pleaded with the Emperor, "Your Majesty, I have never said such things! I was deceived—please forgive me!"

The Emperor looked down at her, his usually gentle eyes now ice-cold. When Yan Langqing met his gaze, her heart pounded violently. Having spent so much time in the palace, she seldom returned home and had never realized that her family had become so overbearing. She had only wanted to learn a few more dishes and genuinely sought to mentor commoner chefs, but instead, she had harmed them. No wonder the esteemed chefs invited today had all looked at her with stiff expressions—full of silent fury and even disdain.

But what others thought of her no longer mattered. What truly concerned her was whether the Emperor would still favor her. The heir of the Tang family had long since lost interest in her. Now, she had lost the golden knife, the recipe book, her reputation, and the people's goodwill. She could not afford to lose the Emperor's favor as well. Without him, after today, she would be nothing.

Yan Shouye was so terrified that he dared not utter a word, simply kowtowing behind his daughter. When he had once flaunted his power and oppressed his peers, he had never imagined that he would one day face such retribution.

Lin Dan continued dismantling the stolen recipes and setting them aside to be returned to their rightful owners.

The Emperor glanced at her before finally knitting his brows and saying, "Rise. Your family’s restaurant has already been shut down—let the past be the past. Those who own these recipes, take them back. From now on, continue making them as you always have. I am the Emperor, but I am also the ruler of all my people. Whatever I can eat, the people of this nation can eat as well."

With a single light remark, he let the Yan family off the hook. Prince Cheng and Prince Gong both looked dissatisfied but refrained from pressing further.

Lin Dan continued sorting through the recipe book until she reached one particular page. For the first time, a ripple of emotion flickered across her otherwise calm expression. "If I recall correctly," she said, "this 'Ten Thousand Blessings Pork' is Imperial Chef Yan’s signature dish, isn't it? It was because of this dish that His Majesty recognized your talent and brought you into the palace."

Yan Langqing’s briefly relieved expression instantly tensed once more.

Lin Dan glanced at her with a hint of mockery in her tone. “But who would have known that the authentic Wanfu Meat isn’t made this way? In fact, it’s not even made with meat. Chef Yan, I remember you once said that you would never cook my father’s dishes in your lifetime. So why are you now using my father’s painstaking creation to advance your own career? You truly are someone who says one thing on the surface but does another behind the scenes…”

Yan Langqing’s lips trembled as if she wanted to refute, but she was too nervous to speak. Meanwhile, Yan Shouye shouted righteously, “Lin Dan, stop talking nonsense! This dish was clearly created by my Langqing herself! I saw it with my own eyes!”

Lin Dan closed the cookbook and said slowly, “Oh? Was it really your own creation, or did you hear it from my father’s disciples? If I remember correctly, both of my father’s disciples are now working as head chefs at the Yan family restaurant.”

“You—you have no proof! You’re slandering us!” Yan Shouye was so furious that he almost coughed up blood. Meanwhile, the accused Yan Langqing remained silent, her face deathly pale.

Lin Dan opened the door and said, “Whether or not I have proof, let’s wait until I cook the real Wanfu Meat.” With that, she strode straight to the kitchen.

The Emperor gave Yan Langqing a deep look before following her at a leisurely pace. The others could no longer sit still and rushed to watch the commotion. The twists and turns of this competition were truly exhilarating! Who could have imagined that the seemingly doomed Lin Dan would turn the tables under the Emperor’s pressure? And who would have thought that the gentle and kind-seeming Chef Yan was actually a scheming woman who would stop at nothing to get ahead?

Lin Dan was the Emperor’s honored guest. Since she wanted to use the kitchen, the restaurant staff dared not refuse. They immediately cleared the largest cooking station for her and prepared the necessary ingredients.

She picked up a block of tofu, cut it into two-inch cubes, and carefully carved intricate Wan-shaped patterns onto one side. Then, she placed them into a rich bone broth to simmer. After about two-quarters of an hour, she removed them and transferred them to a pan with a bit of braising sauce, continuously adding seasonings to thicken the liquid into a light glaze. Finally, she returned the tofu cubes to the sauce, allowing only the carved side to be submerged.

Prince Cheng curiously remarked, “You didn’t use enough sauce. The tofu isn’t fully immersed, so it won’t absorb enough flavor.”

Lin Dan smiled faintly. “Your Highness, you may not know, but this is exactly the flavor I’m aiming for.”

Two-quarters of an hour later, she carefully removed the tofu cubes and arranged them neatly on a dish. Upon closer inspection, the crowd saw that the tofu had turned one part deep brown and nine parts milky white, forming a striking contrast.

Next, Lin Dan fried the tofu in hot oil, crisping up only the side with the sauce while leaving the other side untouched. Once done, she simmered the tofu again in bone broth, then braised it in red sauce, and finally steamed it in a bamboo steamer. To finish, she cooked a thick sauce using minced fish, chicken, and pork, which she poured over the tofu before garnishing it with minced ginger and scallions.

By now, the tofu had absorbed the rich flavors of both the meat broth and braising sauce. It emitted an incredibly savory aroma, and due to its caramelized surface and crispy texture, it looked exactly like braised pork skin. If they hadn’t seen it being made, the crowd would have thought they were looking at a dish of red-braised pork rather than tofu.

The Emperor was the first to take a bite, his eyes immediately lighting up. The tofu didn’t just look like braised pork—it tasted like it too! But instead of being greasy, it was rich, tender, and packed with deep umami flavors.

Lin Dan explained calmly, “My mother loved eating meat but feared gaining weight, so my father developed this dish for her. Wanfu Meat was born from that idea. It retains all the best aspects of meat dishes while eliminating the downsides—it’s not greasy, yet it’s soft, flavorful, and melts in your mouth. My father told me about this dish, and he also told his two disciples. However, he never recorded it in the Yan family’s cookbook. Back then, he didn’t dare call it ‘Wanfu Meat’—instead, he called it ‘Wan-shaped Meat’ because only by carving intricate Wan patterns could the tofu fully absorb the flavors. Chef Yan, you must have obtained this recipe from my father’s disciples, but since you couldn’t make tofu taste like meat, you simply decided to use pork instead, didn’t you? And yet, this humble vegetarian dish, once it came from your hands, suddenly became a special creation designed solely for the Emperor’s birthday feast. Your ability to cater to imperial favor is truly remarkable. If only you had applied the same effort to your culinary skills, you wouldn’t have lost to me today.”

Without extensive experience and relentless practice, even with a recipe in hand, an ordinary cook could never replicate a dish exactly. If one didn’t know how to handle the ingredients, control the heat, or balance the seasoning, a single misstep would alter the dish completely.

Just as Lin Dan had said, Yan Langqing had never been able to make tofu taste like meat. In desperation, she had simply used pork instead. It wasn’t that she didn’t want to create her own dishes, but back when she was expelled by the Marquis, she had been lost and desperate. She wanted so badly to make a name for herself, to establish a foothold in the capital, to prove her worth—so much so that she had strayed onto the wrong path without realizing it.

Under the Emperor’s scrutinizing gaze, the last bit of her composure crumbled. Her once-straightened back slowly slumped.

This time, she had lost—completely and utterly. And with that loss came total disgrace!


==========================================================================


Chapter 36: The Cook 35

Yan Langqing became famous for creating the dish "Wanfu Meat," which led to her being selected by the emperor to be the imperial chef. However, this so-called signature dish was actually stolen from someone else's hard work. Although Lin Dan had no concrete evidence, she was able to completely replicate the color, fragrance, and taste of Wanfu Meat using only a few blocks of tofu, even surpassing Yan Langqing's version. This was enough to prove the truth behind her words.

Moreover, Lin Dan's father's two apprentices worked as head chefs at Yan's restaurant, earning a significant monthly income. If she were to summon them for questioning, it wouldn't be hard to uncover the truth.

However, the emperor was uninterested in these matters. As the ruler of the world, he could protect anyone he wished, and others could not easily challenge his decisions. Without even inquiring about Yan Langqing's crime of deceiving the emperor, he simply took her away, and the competition ended hastily. Fortunately, Lin Dan was not bothered by this. She wrapped the golden knife and recipe in red silk and left the fragrance garden leisurely.

Tang Jiu, following behind her, whispered, "No wonder you told me not to interfere. Did you already have a plan in mind?"

Before Lin Dan could answer, the Duke of Weiyuan walked over with a smile and said, "Manager Lin, I’m thirty-nine this year. I once had a wife, but she has passed away. I have no children or concubines. I have power, wealth, and ability. If you don't mind, how about making a lifelong promise with me?"

Lin Dan stared at him in surprise, unable to speak for a long time.

Tang Jiu furrowed his brows and scolded, "Your Excellency, please don't joke around like this. Be careful not to tarnish Manager Lin's reputation!"

"When did I joke?" The Duke of Weiyuan said seriously. "If I could marry a woman as wise, virtuous, and gentle as Manager Lin, it would be a blessing I have earned in several lifetimes. Tang young master, you seem quite eager. Could it be that you also have inappropriate thoughts about Manager Lin?"

"You’re talking nonsense!" Tang Jiu hurriedly turned to look at Lin Dan, only to see her already talking to Prince Cheng and Prince Gong. She then got into a carriage and left without a second glance. For ordinary people, marrying into a prestigious family seemed like an opportunity they could only dream of, but for her, it felt like nothing but trouble.

Aside from mastering culinary arts, Lin Dan seemed indifferent to the world, and this contradictory demeanor—being without desires but incredibly serious—deeply attracted those around her. Tang Jiu stared blankly at the departing carriage, looking extremely dejected. The Duke of Weiyuan, twisting the ring on his finger, looked at her with determination.

Meanwhile, Yan Langqing was nervously kneeling beside the emperor. The emperor was leisurely unwrapping a gray-water zongzi, savoring it with obvious pleasure.

"I didn’t expect the zongzi soaked in gray water to be so delicious. After returning, I’ll have the imperial kitchen study it and make it just like this." Yan Langqing was right next to him, but he made no mention of asking her to replicate the gray-water zongzi, showing that his opinion of her had greatly diminished after the earlier competition and subsequent conflicts.

Yan Langqing’s face immediately turned pale.

As the carriage passed Qingyun Alley, the emperor slowly said, "Stop the carriage, send some people to seal Yan’s restaurant."

Yan Langqing suddenly raised her head in shock.

The emperor then glanced at her indifferently and smiled nonchalantly, "What? You fraudulently issued an imperial decree and engaged in monopolistic practices. Do you really think I will let you off so easily?" As he spoke, an angry shout from Yan Shouye came from the carriage behind them, questioning the guards for sealing his restaurant. The guards pointed to the carriage in front and said it was the emperor's command, and his tongue seemed to have been struck dumb.

The emperor snorted coldly, and Yan Langqing trembled all over. She thought she had completely lost the emperor’s favor, but unexpectedly, he took her hand and softened his tone, saying, "You’ve been in the palace for seven or eight years, enjoying all kinds of delicacies and having renowned chefs at your disposal. If you want to learn any culinary skills, I’ll have them teach you everything. Logically speaking, your skills should not be worse than a country girl like Lin Dan. But look, you still lost to her today. Even your signature dishes were stolen or copied from others, with no originality. This shows that you lack a bit of talent in the culinary arts."

Yan Langqing couldn't lift her head, her pale face slowly turning red with shame and humiliation.

The emperor then changed his tone, "Since you lack the talent to be a chef, how about becoming my woman? I won’t mistreat you."

Yan Langqing suddenly raised her head, looking at the emperor in disbelief. After struggling for a while, she finally nodded. She had lost everything, made enemies in the culinary world, and had her restaurant sealed by the imperial family. After leaving the palace, where else could she go? But becoming an empress was different—she had served others before, but now, others would serve her. What was there not to like?

The emperor stroked her delicate face gently, his touch seemingly tender, but his words were filled with coldness, "Once you enter the palace, make sure your family stays in line. If they cause trouble for me, I won’t show mercy."

Yan Langqing trembled violently and quickly nodded in fear. In her daze, she didn’t realize that the emperor, who had once been so attentive and protective of her, had completely changed his attitude. He had thought she was a pure and kind-hearted girl, the last piece of purity in the dirty palace. But it turned out she was no different from anyone else. She could calculate, exploit, and bully the weak, and her family was rough, ignorant, and arrogant, which only disgusted him further.

The emperor never believed in the saying "A lotus grows from the mud without getting stained." People stuck in the mire only became dirtier because they had to survive, and would use any means necessary, just like him. In an instant, he completely abandoned any hopes or affection he had for Yan Langqing, now seeing her as just another conquest to be won, to be tamed with a sweet reward after a stick.

However, Yan Langqing did not understand the emperor’s true feelings and still thought she was special to him. She gathered her courage and said, "Your Majesty, may I stay at home a little longer? My father’s injuries are not yet healed. I want to wait until he fully recovers before returning to the palace."

The emperor stared at her deeply for a moment and then, after a while, nodded, indifferent.

On this side, Lin Dan had already returned to the alley at the fork in the road. As soon as she got off the carriage, a few young men greeted her with great joy: "Shopkeeper Lin, you're finally back! When will you open the shop?"

"I’m not opening the shop anymore. I will leave the capital soon," Lin Dan waved her hand calmly.

The young men showed expressions of great disappointment. They wanted to persuade her further, but then a eunuch came leading a group of guards, walking toward them with a loud voice: "Are you Lin Dan, the famous chef? You won the competition today, and the emperor has awarded you a plaque. Please accept it."

Lin Dan then noticed that behind the eunuch, two guards were carrying a square plaque wrapped in silk. When the silk was uncovered, it revealed six majestic characters written in gold paint—"Inheritor of the Golden Knife Imperial Chef," along with the emperor’s personal seal.

Unfortunately, by now, these words meant little to Lin Dan. Still, she accepted the plaque, gave the eunuch and guards a red envelope, and quietly shut the door behind her, going inside to pack her things. The young men standing outside were completely stunned. After a long silence, one finally said, "Oh my, Shopkeeper Lin is actually the inheritor of the Golden Knife Imperial Chef! Incredible! We’ve been eating imperial dishes every day!"

"Stop dreaming! Didn’t you hear? Shopkeeper Lin is not opening a shop here anymore! She’s the heir of the Golden Knife Imperial Chef. If she opens a shop, it'll be in the West City. Who would want to cook noodles for us for a couple of coins a bowl?" The others were full of regret. If they had known Shopkeeper Lin was the inheritor of the imperial chef, they would have treated her culinary skills with more respect. Looking back, her skills and character were impeccable. Her opening a shop in the South City was truly a blessing for the people there. Unfortunately, they didn't appreciate it.

Lin Dan packed up her things and directly left the capital. Before reaching her home, she saw Qi standing at the road's end, looking anxiously. Qi had never expected her daughter to win, only hoping for her safe return. So, when Lin Dan opened the silk cloth to reveal the recipe and the Golden Knife, Qi's eyes widened, and she covered her mouth, stunned for a while.

"What… What is this?" she asked incredulously.

Lin Dan handed her the items with a light smile, "Mother, I’ve won back Father’s things. Please keep them safe."

"Won… won? You really won?" Qi continued to stroke the Golden Knife and the recipe, gradually breaking into a joyful smile. But after a while, she started sobbing uncontrollably. Over the years, her daughter had wandered far and wide, facing so many hardships, suffering greatly, and she had felt heartbroken for her.

Lin Dan hugged Qi gently and patted her back, speaking calmly, "Mother, this matter is done. Let’s go somewhere else and explore. The world is vast, and there are many delicious foods waiting for us."

Qi nodded through her sobs, her eyes filled with joy.

…

In these times, going out was not easy. It required preparing many supplies, planning the route, and securing travel permits—it was not something you could just do on a whim. Lin Dan stayed in the outskirts of the capital for over a month, and as everything was ready for departure, bad news came from the capital—The Yongding Marquis's house was raided for colluding with foreign enemies, and Concubine Tang was cast into the cold palace, facing potential extermination of her family.

Seeing the situation rapidly change, Lin Dan stayed behind, sending Qi away first and then dispatching a servant to gather information in the city. The developments were swift; in just three days, the crime had been confirmed, and all the women of the Yongding Marquis’s family were exiled 3,000 miles away, while all the men were sentenced to be beheaded.

A few days later, even worse news arrived. Sixty-eight women from the Yongding Marquis’s family, unable to endure the humiliation, all hanged themselves, including Concubine Tang in the cold palace. The emperor was furious, and he couldn't wait until autumn to execute Tang Jiu and others. The urgency was clear. On the day of the executions, Lin Dan rushed to the execution ground with a large food box to bid farewell to Tang Jiu.



=============================================================

Chapter 37: The Cook's Daughter 36

After consecutive days of interrogation and torture, Tang Jiu had become much thinner. His once bright, star-like eyes were now murky. His neck and hands were bound in shackles, unable to move at all. He remained silent, but behind him, Tang Peng shouted hoarsely, “We are wronged! All the blame is mine, and mine alone. You can kill me, but don't touch my family! Ninth Brother, Ninth Brother, I was wrong! You told me not to associate with Yan Langqing, but I didn't listen. All of this is my fault! The token was borrowed by Yan Langqing, and the Xiongnu King was released because of her. I never imagined she borrowed the token for this purpose, I truly never thought of it!”

The executioner, hearing his reckless attempt to drag the palace’s empresses into it, quickly ordered the guards to silence him.

Lin Dan stood in the crowd for a while, seemingly understanding what had happened. No wonder there had been several martial law declarations in the capital last month, they were searching for the Xiongnu King, who had escaped the city using the Yongding Marquis' token. How does Yan Langqing fit into this? The emperor was not after the truth, but rather an excuse to suppress the Yongding Marquis’ family. He had recalled the renowned war god Tang Jiu to the capital, placed the Prince of Dianqian under house arrest, sought a marriage alliance with the young princess, and summoned Wei Yuanhou under the pretense of illness. All these actions were to solidify imperial power and eliminate any opposition.

It seemed he had been planning the elimination of these people for a long time but had lacked the opportunity. Now that Yan Langqing had handed him a knife, he was naturally ready to strike.

Lin Dan quickly grasped the situation but did not have the ability to help Tang Jiu and the others. As the executioner prepared to read the final verdict, she hurriedly climbed onto the execution platform and called out, “Please, sir, grant some more time. I have come to bid them farewell.” She lifted the food box in her hand.

It was customary for condemned prisoners to be given a full meal before execution, so they wouldn’t become hungry ghosts in the afterlife. The executioner, who had long been accustomed to bloody work, was superstitious about these matters and immediately waved his hand, saying, “Time is running out, hurry up.”

Lin Dan nodded repeatedly, quickly taking out the food from the box and arranging it. Since the prisoners were shackled, it was inconvenient for them to eat, so she had Xiaozhu, Shaoyao, and Dujun feed them one by one while she herself knelt beside Tang Jiu with a bowl in her hands.

The people's curses and Tang Peng's cries for justice did not stir any emotion in Tang Jiu. He remained kneeling with half-closed eyes, neither sad nor happy. It was only when Lin Dan appeared that he suddenly raised his head, disbelief and then fiery intensity in his gaze, his dark pupils briefly gleaming.

“Everyone else is distancing themselves from me, but only you came forward.” His voice was hoarse, “You shouldn’t have come.”

“If I didn’t come, my conscience wouldn’t let me go,” Lin Dan said, tearing a chicken leg into pieces, mixing it with rice and pickles, feeding it to Tang Jiu bite by bite. She gently said, “Is it tasty? This is a chicken I raised myself. I killed it when it was only two months old, and my mother kept complaining.”

Facing death, Tang Jiu actually smiled lightly, “You still remember what I said?”

“Of course, you said your favorite food was young chicken, and you could eat it every day without getting tired of it,” Lin Dan whispered, wiping his mouth with a handkerchief, “I killed all the chicks at home, and today, you can have as much as you want.”

Tang Jiu looked at her steadily, and after a long while, he lowered his head and started eating in large bites. His eyes gradually became moist. The sun unknowingly climbed overhead, and noon was approaching. Tang Jiu swallowed the last mouthful of food and softly said, “If I don’t make it out of the city, go to the hometown restaurant and wait. I’ve bought the place, so you can stay there for now. Someone will come to take you out of the city later. Lin Dan, please take care of yourself in the future.”

Lin Dan was taken aback, but showed no signs on her face. She packed up the food box, bowed to the other members of the marquis’ family, and then disappeared into the crowd. Behind her, the sound of Tang Peng’s shouts echoed, “Shopkeeper Lin, I’m sorry, please forgive me!” Sadly, he realized too late. Driven by infatuation, he had ruined not only himself but also his entire family.

After leaving the execution ground, Lin Dan pondered for a moment, feeling that there was something hidden in Tang Jiu’s words. What did he mean by “if I don’t make it out of the city”? Why wouldn’t he be able to leave? Unless the city was under full martial law, searching for high-ranking criminals, like the Xiongnu King last time… Could someone be planning to rescue him from the execution ground?

Indeed, all the women of the Yongding Marquis' family had committed suicide, including the Empress Dowager of the palace. Without them as hostages, the Yongding Marquis had no restraints and would surely send someone to rescue his only legitimate son, but only if the emperor had forced him into rebellion.

Would the Yongding Marquis rebel? Lin Dan had already gotten her answer from Tang Jiu’s words. She immediately turned the carriage around and headed toward the intersection alley. By now, it would likely be too late to head toward the city gates. The rescue mission would surely have been in motion by then, and the scene at the execution ground would have turned chaotic.

Lin Dan’s guess was correct. No sooner had she left, Tang Jiu broke free from his shackles, rescued his family, and after joining up with the men in black who had come to assist, they rushed toward the city gates. They ran swiftly, unstoppable, and soon escaped the capital. Half a day later, everyone realized that the Prince of Dianqian and the young princess were also missing, and the capital was immediately thrown into turmoil.

All eight city gates were shut, and the streets were full of guards searching back and forth, the atmosphere tense. Lin Dan, being an old acquaintance of Tang Jiu, knew that if she stayed in the capital any longer, she would inevitably be questioned about his whereabouts. She was just about to send her servants away and take responsibility herself when there was a knock at the door. A tall man presented a letter, telling her to leave the city with him.

The letter was written by Tang Jiu himself, recalling many childhood memories they shared. Lin Dan confirmed the authenticity of the letter, then followed the man out. They boarded a luxurious carriage, and without inspection, confidently left the capital. Only then did Lin Dan realize that the man was actually a prince from Mongol Kingdom, specially dispatched by Tang Jiu to escort her.

“He told me before he was imprisoned that his chances were slim. If you came to send him off, he entrusted me to take care of you and help you leave. If you didn’t come, he asked me to give you this box,” the man said, handing over a heavy box before bowing and riding off.

Lin Dan opened the box to find it filled with gold and jewels, and her heart warmed. Ten years ago, it was also outside the city at the Shili Pavilion when a servant sent by Tang Jiu gave her a small box filled with silver, which she firmly refused. Ten years later, faced with the same scene, she felt she wanted to accept it. In this world, she was never truly alone—there would always be one or two people who would remember her.

After that day, Lin Dan left the capital, wandering from place to place. The once prosperous and peaceful Great Chu Kingdom was beginning to fall into chaos. First, the Prince of Dianqian raised the banner to eliminate the faction at court, then the Xiongnu King led his army to invade. The Yongding Marquis' food supplies and military funding were cut off by the court, and though they intended to fight back against the Xiongnu, they were powerless and had no choice but to rebel.

Months of war raged on. One day, the Prince of Dianqian unexpectedly died in his tent. The Prince of Dianqian’s son immediately ascended to the throne and, together with the Yongding Marquis' son, joined forces to resist the Xiongnu. The once perilous situation of the Great Chu Kingdom finally had some hope. But in the critical moment, the emperor unexpectedly issued a decree ordering Wei Yuanhou to lead his forces to ambush the two rebels, aiming to wipe out the insurrectionists.

This order was absurd. If both armies were defeated, the Xiongnu King’s forces would sweep in and threaten the heartland of the central plains. Having lost the northwest and southwest forces, the remaining troops could no longer resist the Xiongnu cavalry. Once the situation spiraled out of control, the Great Chu Kingdom would cease to exist.

However, the emperor seemed confident and issued three successive decrees ordering Wei Yuanhou to deploy forces. A great battle loomed, with consequences that were unimaginable.

At this moment, Lin Dan, who had been living in seclusion in the deep mountains, had a dream. She dreamt that the young Lin Dan lost the competition, feeling both guilty and angry. She threw the golden knife, the recipe, and even the master’s memorial tablet into the fire. Just as she did this, Tang Jiu and Yan Langqing happened to arrive and witnessed the scene. They were both extremely disgusted with her. Although the old Marquis vouched for her and allowed her to stay, they treated her as though she didn't exist, always taking another path when they saw her. The more Tang Jiu disliked her, the more she clung to him, devising various vicious schemes to frame Yan Langqing. Originally, it was the Yan family who slandered her father, but due to her reckless actions, she ended up solidifying the accusation that Lin Baotian had betrayed his teacher and ancestors, leading to an unexplainable, ruined reputation.

Gradually, she became more extreme and pushed Tang Jiu further away, while the old Marquis’ last bit of protection for her also faded. On the other hand, Yan Langqing gradually earned the old Marquis' approval, and through her persistence, she developed a deep relationship with Tang Jiu, eventually marrying him. The more happy they were, the more painful it was for Lin Dan.

As time passed, Yan Langqing gradually became a qualified Marquise, earning praise from everyone, even the Emperor. He began calling her into the palace under the pretext of accompanying Empress Tang, and over time, she was targeted by certain individuals who used her to frame Empress Tang. They poisoned the food she prepared, causing Empress Tang to miscarry.

The Emperor investigated and eventually traced the plot back to Yan Langqing. Unable to harm her, he made Lin Dan, who always clashed with Yan Langqing, take the blame. In front of everyone, Lin Dan was publicly beaten to death. Lin Dan’s short life ended there, while Yan Langqing’s story continued.

The more the Emperor couldn’t have her, the more he thought of her, and he plotted to send Tang Jiu to the battlefield, secretly killing him. He then used another concubine to dispose of Empress Tang and called Yan Langqing into the palace, where she enjoyed ongoing favor. Years later, the Xiongnu King, whom Yan Langqing had inadvertently saved, began a fierce attack on the Great Chu, repeatedly claiming he would take Yan Langqing as his queen. After years of war between the two nations, both were severely weakened, but Tang Jiu "rose from the dead" and joined the battle. The King of Dianqian seized the opportunity to rebel, declaring himself emperor. What was once a peaceful and prosperous era turned into a hell on earth. As for the Prince of Dianqian and the Young Princess, they had escaped earlier and, after being captured by Tang Jiu, poisoned themselves to death.

Everyone's fate was so absurd and tragic, and all of it was for the sake of a woman.

After waking up, Lin Dan couldn’t help but feel a mix of disbelief and irony. She believed that if she hadn’t come, this would likely have been the fate of the original owner and the fixed path of this world’s development. Because of one woman, families fell apart, kingdoms crumbled, and people suffered. Was this fate? It was laughably absurd!


===========================================================


Chapter 38: The Chef 37 (End)

Thinking back to the peaceful and prosperous times, and looking at the current state of constant war and the shattered land, Lin Dan realized she could no longer stand idly by. She unearthed a jar of wine hidden in a cave, and after some twists and turns, managed to reach the frontlines, hoping to meet with the Marquis of Weiyuan.

"Who wants to see this marquis?" The Marquis of Weiyuan almost thought he heard wrong.

"Replying to the Marquis, it's Lin Dan, the shopkeeper. She has been waiting for you outside the camp for over twenty days. If I hadn't seen her when I left the camp today, who knows when she would have waited until." The head of the Marquis' guard had followed his master to the hometown restaurant every day and surely knew Lin Dan. It was because of her excellent culinary skills that the Marquis, whose health had been failing, was able to recover his strength.

"She’s a lone woman. Why isn’t she staying at home, running all the way to the border?" The Marquis frowned, clearly displeased, but still hurried to the door to meet her.

"Marquis, it's been many years, how have you been?" Lin Dan smiled and bowed.

"Don’t stand here, come with me to the tent." The Marquis muttered as he walked, "How did you end up here? Did you encounter any danger on the way? This is no safe place, soon there may be rivers of blood and bodies everywhere. You should leave quickly, I'll have someone escort you."

"Marquis, I’m here to deliver a gift to you." Lin Dan placed the jar from her arms onto the table.

"What is this wine?" The Marquis finally showed the first smile he'd had in days. Ever since he got used to eating at the hometown restaurant, he had rarely drunk alcohol, because Lin Dan wouldn't allow it. He didn’t know why he followed her advice so obediently, but the fact was that Lin Dan's words were worth listening to. His already ailing body had gradually recovered under her meticulous care, otherwise, the Marquis of Weiyuan would have long been dead.

"This is the thousand-day wine you've been longing for." Lin Dan poured the clear wine into an empty bowl.

"We’ve been apart for less than three years, haven’t we? Well, Lin Dan, you said brewing the thousand-day wine would take at least three years. So where did this jar come from? Are you trying to deceive me?" The Marquis glared at her with a scowl.

"This is wine I stored elsewhere, it has been buried for five years." Lin Dan smiled lightly, "However, today I’m not here to give you this jar, but what’s inside the wine. Marquis, take a look."

The Marquis leaned in and looked closely. To his disbelief, a long, pinkish meat worm crawled out from the clear wine. As soon as the worm emerged, the rich and fragrant wine released a stronger, more overpowering smell that could be sensed throughout the entire camp. Not to mention how the Marquis himself felt drawn to it, even the guards standing outside the tent couldn't help but sniff the air, swaying as if they were drunk.

"This is a wine worm?" The Marquis could hardly believe his eyes.

"Yes. Only the finest wine can nurture such a worm. If you place it in clear water, after a while, it will turn the water into wine," Lin Dan said as she fished out the worm and placed it into a bowl of water. After a while, a rich aroma of wine wafted up from the bowl.

The Marquis took a deep breath and laughed heartily: "Lin Dan, I like your gift!"

However, Lin Dan’s expression turned serious as she continued, "But do you know, Marquis, a wine worm can live in good wine or clear water, but if it is placed in polluted liquid, it will die instantly." As she spoke, she placed the worm into an empty bowl and poured some brown tea into it. The worm began to thrash around violently before stiffening, and then slowly turned into a pool of blood.

The Marquis' joy turned to despair in an instant. His sharp eyes fixed on Lin Dan, furious but unable to scold her. No matter how valuable the wine worm was, it could never surpass the weight of Lin Dan in his heart.

Lin Dan met his gaze without fear and continued, "Marquis, I speak without arrogance when I say that my hands can turn decay into brilliance. No matter how strange the ingredients, they will turn into delicacies in my hands. But there is one thing, no matter how hard I try, I cannot make it into food. Do you know what it is?"

"What is it?" The Marquis patiently asked.

"It’s Guanyin soil. On my journey, I’ve seen countless rivers of blood, and people starving to death. They lost their homes, living each day in fear, so hungry that they ate anything, grabbing handfuls of Guanyin soil and stuffing it into their mouths, only to burst their bellies and die. Have you ever tasted Guanyin soil? Do you know what it feels like to be homeless, with your life hanging by a thread? The people of Great Chu are like this worm, struggling in the polluted liquid, and one day, they’ll turn into blood." Lin Dan's voice grew firmer, "Marquis, what are you actually fighting for at the border?"

The Marquis was about to reply when Lin Dan interrupted, "You are fighting for the imperial power, for the Emperor, and for his absolute rule over Great Chu. You pride yourself on your loyalty, but aside from that, you cannot see the common people struggling under the imperial power. If you truly ambush the joint forces of Lord Tang and the young prince, the Xiongnu cavalry will enter the Central Plains, and the land will be shattered. At that time, the Emperor will only need to cede a few cities to keep his throne, but who will see the people struggling within those cities? The Xiongnu’s evil nature, you know it well. They know only how to invade, not to govern. They will slaughter the citizens, burn down all the houses, and leave no one alive. With those cities in their hands, they will only grow stronger, while Great Chu will weaken, and in five years, another war will break out. Who will save the people, who will save the world? You?"

Lin Dan stared at the Marquis, pressing him, "What you are doing now, are you defending Great Chu and saving the people, or are you helping the tyrants and throwing the commoners into disaster? This battle may bring peace to Great Chu for a few years, but then what?"

She poured out the dirty water from the bowl, her voice calm again, "In chaotic times, people are like ants. No one escapes the fate of being crushed. In peaceful times, there’s wine, there’s food, and even if one wine worm dies, thousands more can be born. Marquis, you hold a high position. Even if the country falls and the people suffer, you can still find food and brew fine wine. But do you know that while you enjoy the wine and food, the people are eating dirt, or even human flesh? Marquis, withdraw your troops and restore peace to the world. Without this wine worm, I can raise more for you in the future. Do you agree?"

The Marquis, filled with frustration, was deep in thought for a long time. Finally, after what seemed like an eternity, he slowly turned the ring on his finger and said, "Lin Dan, we’ve made a deal. You can’t go back on your word. From now on, I want to drink as much wine as I want, and you can’t stop me."

Lin Dan smiled and nodded, "It’s a deal. No regrets."

That night, Tang Jiu and the Prince of Dianqian, no, he should now be called the King of Dianqian, were sitting by the campfire drinking wine. Tomorrow, the Xiongnu King would launch a full-scale attack on them, and it was likely that Wei Yuanhou would take advantage of the chaos to intervene. Being attacked from both sides, this war was almost certain to be lost. But they could not retreat; if they did, the Xiongnu would advance, and the people of the Great Chu Kingdom would suffer a catastrophic fate.

“If only we could persuade that old bastard, Wei Yuanhou.” The King of Dianqian spoke in a low voice.

“Can't do that. He won't see anyone before the battle starts.” Tang Jiu shook his head.

The King of Dianqian sneered and gritted his teeth. “Then let’s fight to the death.”

At that moment, Zhao Liu rushed over, handed a letter, and lowered his voice. “General, this is from Wei Yuanhou's messenger. Please take a look.”

Tang Jiu tore open the envelope and read the letter quickly. His tense face showed a hint of surprise. The King of Dianqian leaned in to take a look, also quite surprised. In the letter, Wei Yuanhou not only agreed to withdraw his troops, but also offered to cooperate with them in staging a trap to lure the Xiongnu King into a death trap.

“Could it be a trick?” The King of Dianqian asked without hesitation.

“Find out who Wei Yuanhou has met recently. His attitude has changed drastically, it can't be without reason. Whether it’s a trick or not, this is a glimmer of hope.” Tang Jiu calmly analyzed.

The scouts soon gathered information, saying that a graceful, beautiful woman had brought a jar of wine to meet Wei Yuanhou. The wine was magical; just opening the jar, the rich aroma filled the entire camp. The two of them had a private conversation in the tent, and after the woman left, Wei Yuanhou changed his mind.

“Is it Manager Lin?” The King of Dianqian chuckled. “Only Manager Lin could brew such fine wine. That old bastard listens to Manager Lin the most. When she tells him not to drink, he won’t even touch a cup; when she tells him to have breakfast, he’ll be waiting at the hometown restaurant before dawn. I didn’t expect Manager Lin to be so righteous, running all the way to the border to persuade the old bastard to withdraw his troops. We all owe her our lives.”

Tang Jiu's eyes flickered, a mixture of joy and sorrow. After a long while, he spoke in a hoarse voice. “Not just you and me, the entire world owes her a word of thanks. In that case, I’ll personally meet Wei Yuanhou tonight. Zhao Liu, send someone to bring Lin Dan back, the border is too dangerous, I don’t feel safe.”

However, after that night, Lin Dan disappeared. The war ended with a crushing defeat for the Xiongnu. The Xiongnu King lost his right arm and barely escaped with his life, from then on, fearing the people of the Central Plains like a tiger. The Emperor's secret letter, colluding with the Xiongnu to betray the city, was found by Tang Jiu, which forced the Emperor to abdicate. Tang Peng was the first general to enter the capital, making his way to the harem, where he personally strangled the already-disfavored Yan Langqing, hanging her body in the Cold Palace until it rotted into white bones, only allowing the palace maids to take it down then. That was also the place where Imperial Concubine Tang had hanged herself.

The once-glorious Yan family's restaurant had long turned into a ruin. Lin Er and Lin San had no way to make a living and were living in dire straits. One day, they passed by the alleyway and saw that their hometown restaurant was still open, and business was booming. Tang Jiu, who had already ascended the throne as Emperor, was sitting inside in plain clothes, seriously reading a stack of books, his expression filled with joy and longing.

It was a travelogue written by Lin Dan, entrusted to someone to bring back to the capital and given to Chef Qiu as teaching material. This hometown restaurant was opened by Chef Qiu. She had recorded the delicious wines and food she encountered in a story-telling style, with vivid and descriptive language. As Tang Jiu read these words, he could imagine how free-spirited and carefree she was. Every so often, she would send a jar of fine wine to Wei Yuanhou, but unfortunately, Tang Jiu always intercepted it. He had tried to find her, but she always slipped away just a step ahead of him, like a wisp of wind, slipping through his fingers just when he thought he could catch her.

Someone once asked Tang Jiu what the most delicious meal he had ever eaten was. Tang Jiu closed his eyes, thought for a moment, and smiled. “You might not believe it, but the most delicious meal I’ve ever had was a beheaded meal...”


=======================================

Chapter 39: Unparalleled in the World 1

Lin Dan was awakened by a sharp heart pain. As soon as she opened her eyes, she realized that she was standing in a cramped and dim place. Ten steps away were two iron doors, behind which were a man and a woman. The woman, dressed in red, was extraordinarily beautiful, and her eyes were filled with anger and vigilance as she glared at Lin Dan.

The man was even more handsome than the woman. His thin white robe spread like a flower in the darkness, and his long black hair was scattered around him, emitting a faint fragrance when the wind blew. His exquisite face, like white jade, glowed with a brilliant radiance. He sat quietly behind the iron door, his phoenix eyes slightly lowered, his lips pressed in a thin line, and his expression neutral. If not for his chest rising and falling, Lin Dan would have truly thought he was a lifelike sculpture, radiating a holy light.

However, Lin Dan had no time to concern herself with the man and woman. She glanced at them indifferently, then looked around at the surroundings. Without saying a word, she left. This was clearly a dungeon, surrounded by heavy guards, not an ideal place to organize her thoughts.

After Lin Dan left, the woman in red finally relaxed and angrily said, "Master, she just tried to kill me!"

The man didn't even open his eyes and slowly replied, "Do not mind a dying person."

The woman quickly rushed to the cell door and whispered, "Master, how do you know she is about to die?"

The man became completely still, his breathing slowing as he entered a meditative state. The woman knew that no matter what she said, her master could not hear her at this moment, so she had no choice but to quiet down. She gazed at her master's peerlessly beautiful face through the bars, her eyes flashing with admiration, struggle, and awe...

...

Lin Dan had lost her memory again. Apart from her name, Lin Dan, she could not remember anything. Why "again"? Because this situation seemed very familiar to her, and she was quite adept at dealing with it. She quickly adjusted her emotions, making sure no one could detect anything unusual, and then found a quiet place to sort through her memories.

The original owner was also named Lin Dan and was the Left Protector of the Eastern Saint Sect. This place was the sect's headquarters, located deep within Longyin Mountain. The Eastern Saint Sect was known for its extreme actions and rapid expansion, and in recent years, it had been denounced as an evil cult by the righteous forces, who wished to destroy it. As one of the protectors, Lin Dan was naturally seen as a demoness.

In the original owner's memories, she had done many bad things, but who could know that all of it had been forced upon her? The original owner was an orphan, adopted by the old leader of the Eastern Saint Sect, who taught her martial arts. To repay the old leader's kindness, the original owner swore to protect the young master, who was the old leader's son, He Chongling. When she reached the age of twelve or thirteen and had made some progress in martial arts, the old leader asked her if she wanted to progress further. Without hesitation, she agreed. The old leader then had her swallow a poison, handing her life over to the young master. Only then did he impart to her a top-tier martial arts manual.

The original owner was loyal to the old leader and, over time, developed deep feelings for the young master. She was naturally willing to serve them both. Years later, after the old leader passed away and a new leader took his place, the original owner had grown older and had her own thoughts. It was then that she discovered the "poison" she had swallowed was actually a parasitic insect. This insect lived in her heart meridians and could not be removed. If she ever had any ill thoughts toward He Chongling, she would endure unbearable pain. If she ever thought of killing him, her heart would explode before she could even act.

By the time Lin Dan took over, the original owner had lived in excruciating pain. Fortunately, Lin Dan was able to calm the insect before it spiraled out of control. Otherwise, it would have been too late. Now, Lin Dan's heart still ached faintly, and she believed her heart was already riddled with holes, with not much time left to live.

However, Lin Dan had no other memories, except for an intense obsession with "living." She had fought so hard to obtain this body; she was not going to die without a fight. Desperately, she searched her mind for any useful clues, and the bitter smile on her face deepened.

The original owner's life could only be described with two words—tragic. She was trained like a wild beast by the old leader in her youth and never had a single happy day. When she grew up, she fell in love with a heartless person. He Chongling used both her feelings and the insect to completely control her, but he never regarded her as human. Countless times, the original owner was cut and nearly killed while protecting He Chongling, yet he discarded her as if she were garbage, not even sparing a glance.

To him, the original owner was nothing but a blade, one that could be discarded once it became dull.

Fortunately, the original owner had an extremely strong life force. Several times, she was on the verge of death, only to awaken just in time, push the corpses off her, wipe the blood from her face, and stagger back to the Eastern Saint Sect. She was discarded like a broken shoe again and again, yet each time she returned to He Chongling’s side, unaware of despair, unaware of exhaustion, only feeling a dull pain in her heart in the quiet of the night.

One day, while passing by the Qingjiang River, she met a handsome and ethereal man drifting downstream on a bamboo raft. When his eyes accidentally met hers, he slowly smiled. This seemingly insignificant and ordinary expression planted a seed of happiness in the original owner’s heart, which then blossomed into a beautiful flower.

Unable to control the unspeakable desire within, she followed the man south, protecting him along the way. She silently watched him play the guqin, drink wine, and admire flowers. If he smiled slightly, she would smile with him. If he frowned, she would feel a dull pain in her heart. It was then that she realized her feelings for He Chongling were not love, but obedience and reverence. Had the man not appeared, she would have remained trapped in the mire of He Chongling's influence until her death.

When the realization came, she did not hesitate to abduct the man, bringing him back to the Eastern Saint Sect to be cared for by the sect’s people. She dared not desecrate him, only needing to gaze at him from afar to feel content. However, over time, she noticed that the man grew closer and closer to her maid. They often gathered together, smiling with joy, as if they had endless topics to discuss. Worse still, He Chongling, who was once indifferent and emotionless, began to treat the maid differently, elevating her to the position of Saintess, surpassing the original owner in status.

The original owner endured the jealousy and anger within her because she knew that since He Chongling had set his sights on the maid, he would stop at nothing to obtain her. There was no need for her to act; the maid and the man would be separated soon enough. As expected, He Chongling soon forced the maid to marry him and hastily arranged a wedding. The maid resisted fiercely, fasting and even crashing into pillars, but He Chongling, afraid of being harmed, had no choice but to imprison her and threaten her with the man’s life. He had discovered their special relationship and exploited it, forcing the maid into submission.

The two most important people in her life were taken away by the maid one after another. The original owner could no longer contain herself and went to the dungeon, intending to kill the maid, but little did she know that the poisonous insect within her had been sealed by He Chongling. Any intent to kill the maid would trigger a violent reaction from the insect. He had already regarded the maid as his other half and protected her tightly.

The original owner had fought for He Chongling’s life, her blood almost drained, yet she received no acknowledgment from him. Meanwhile, the maid effortlessly gained everything. In her final moments, suffering the pain of her heart being ripped out, the original owner left behind one last obsession—if she could, she wanted to escape all of this and live as a person, no longer trampled by anyone.

To live as a person, without being trampled, was easier said than done! Lin Dan shook her head and bitterly smiled, thinking to herself, if she couldn’t even save her life, how could she live as a person? However, in a flash, she grasped a faint clue in her mind, quickly took out the supreme martial arts manual passed down by the old sect leader to the original owner, and began to carefully read through it.

The martial art manual was titled "Asura Blade," and the opening sentence was: "Only those who are heartless and emotionless can become Asuras. Life and death, never breaking." After that, there were profound formulas and blade techniques. The original owner had practiced according to these formulas and blade techniques, reaching the realm of a top-tier expert, but she had stopped progressing and could not break through. She had been seeking a breakthrough for years but could not find the right method, so she had to give up.

However, to Lin Dan, the most important line in this martial art was the opening phrase. What did it mean to be heartless and emotionless to become an Asura? What did it mean by life and death, never breaking? The original owner had fallen into pools of blood countless times, and though she should have died, she always miraculously survived. To Lin Dan, this extreme vitality was nothing short of monstrous.

No one is invincible, but the original owner seemed like someone who could not be killed. Was it because of her physical constitution, or was it due to the martial arts she practiced? Lin Dan quickly flipped through the manual, then confidently told herself that if she could perfect the Asura Blade, the answer would naturally become clear.

"Life and death, never breaking" was obviously Lin Dan's only chance at survival, and to become heartless and emotionless may seem difficult for others, but for Lin Dan, it was easy. It was as if she was born without the seven emotions and six desires, and she had completely shut off the original owner’s emotions. Her state of mind immediately began to improve. Meanwhile, a sharp aura suddenly formed in her dantian, traveling through her meridians to her limbs and bones, crushing her veins, bones, and flesh. The pain that swept over her was like a tsunami, unimaginable.

Lin Dan spat out a mouthful of blood but maintained her meditative posture, not daring to move. The pain she was enduring now was many times more intense than the previous heart-ripping pain. The sharp energy felt like countless steel blades, determined to turn her into a pile of blood and flesh. Yet, aside from this, a vitality began to grow in her dantian, quickly repairing her shattered body. Her bones grew stronger, her flesh became more resilient, and her meridians widened...

She seemed to have died a thousand times, yet with each death, she became stronger and more indestructible. Under unimaginable torment, she never fainted. She vaguely realized that only by discarding unnecessary emotions could she truly become powerful. Only those who were truly powerful would not be trampled on. But what kind of pain and choices did one have to endure to reach this understanding?



＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝＝







